Utah statutes.
20A-1-504.   Midterm vacancies in the offices of attorney general, state treasurer, state auditor, and lieutenant governor.

(1) (a)  When a vacancy occurs for any reason in the office of attorney general, state treasurer, or state auditor, it shall be filled for the unexpired term at the next regular general election.

(b)  The governor shall fill the vacancy until the next regular general election by appointing a person who meets the qualifications for the office from three persons nominated by the state central committee of the same political party as the prior officeholder.

(2)  If a vacancy occurs in the office of lieutenant governor, the governor shall, with the consent of the Senate, appoint a person to hold the office until the next regular general election at which the governor stands for election.

